Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4410
Violation; penalty; order for seizure.

The owner of any domestic or hybrid animal or any person who violates any of the provisions of sections 71-4401 to 71-4412 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor. When the owner of any domestic or hybrid animal or other animal fails or refuses to comply with section 71-4406 or 71-4407, the rabies control authority shall obtain an order for seizure of such animal pursuant to Chapter 29, article 8.

Laws 1969, c. 445, § 10, p. 1488;

Laws 1978, LB 685, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 104, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB25, § 12.